Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1924 N 1
SFX 1924 0 ular .

SFX 1925 N 1
SFX 1925 0 ulate .

SFX 1926 N 1
SFX 1926 0 ulauan .

SFX 1927 N 1
SFX 1927 0 ulosities .

SFX 1928 N 1
SFX 1928 0 ulosity .

SFX 1929 N 1
SFX 1929 0 um .

SFX 1930 N 1
SFX 1930 0 ums .

SFX 1931 N 1
SFX 1931 0 ung .

SFX 1932 N 1
SFX 1932 0 uni .

SFX 1933 N 1
SFX 1933 0 upinefish .

SFX 1934 N 1
SFX 1934 0 ur .

SFX 1935 N 1
SFX 1935 0 uration .

SFX 1936 N 1
SFX 1936 0 urch .

SFX 1937 N 1
SFX 1937 0 ure .

SFX 1938 N 1
SFX 1938 0 ures .

SFX 1939 N 1
SFX 1939 0 uria .

SFX 1940 N 1
SFX 1940 0 urs .

SFX 1941 N 1
SFX 1941 0 us .

SFX 1942 N 1
SFX 1942 0 use .

SFX 1943 N 1
SFX 1943 0 user .

SFX 1944 N 1
SFX 1944 0 uses .

SFX 1945 N 1
SFX 1945 0 usinly .

SFX 1946 N 1
SFX 1946 0 usness .

SFX 1947 N 1
SFX 1947 0 usnesses .

SFX 1948 N 1
SFX 1948 0 usov .

SFX 1949 N 1
SFX 1949 0 v .

SFX 1950 N 1
SFX 1950 0 valence .

SFX 1951 N 1
SFX 1951 0 valency .

SFX 1952 N 1
SFX 1952 0 valent .

SFX 1953 N 1
SFX 1953 0 variable .

SFX 1954 N 1
SFX 1954 0 've .

SFX 1955 N 1
SFX 1955 0  Venaticorum .

SFX 1956 N 1
SFX 1956 0 ver .

SFX 1957 N 1
SFX 1957 0 versity .

SFX 1958 N 1
SFX 1958 0 virus .

SFX 1959 N 1
SFX 1959 0 viruses .

SFX 1960 N 1
SFX 1960 0 vo .

SFX 1961 N 1
SFX 1961 0 volume .

SFX 1962 N 1
SFX 1962 0 vowable .

SFX 1963 N 1
SFX 1963 0 wa .

SFX 1964 N 1
SFX 1964 0 wada .

SFX 1965 N 1
SFX 1965 0 walnagar .

SFX 1966 N 1
SFX 1966 0 walpur .

SFX 1967 N 1
SFX 1967 0 war .

SFX 1968 N 1
SFX 1968 0 ware .

SFX 1969 N 1
SFX 1969 0 wares .

SFX 1970 N 1
SFX 1970 0 water .

SFX 1971 N 1
SFX 1971 0 way .

SFX 1972 N 1
SFX 1972 0 weed .

SFX 1973 N 1
SFX 1973 0 weeds .

SFX 1974 N 1
SFX 1974 0 wer .

SFX 1975 N 1
SFX 1975 0 wered .

SFX 1976 N 1
SFX 1976 0 wire .

SFX 1977 N 1
SFX 1977 0 wires .

SFX 1978 N 1
SFX 1978 0 wobbles .

SFX 1979 N 1
SFX 1979 0 wood .

SFX 1980 N 1
SFX 1980 0 woods .

SFX 1981 N 1
SFX 1981 0 work .

SFX 1982 N 1
SFX 1982 0 works .

SFX 1983 N 1
SFX 1983 0 wort .

SFX 1984 N 1
SFX 1984 0 worts .

SFX 1985 N 1
SFX 1985 0 wright .

SFX 1986 N 1
SFX 1986 0 wrights .

SFX 1987 N 1
SFX 1987 0 wster .

SFX 1988 N 1
SFX 1988 0 wsters .

SFX 1989 N 1
SFX 1989 0 wware .

SFX 1990 N 1
SFX 1990 0 wwares .

SFX 1991 N 1
SFX 1991 0 x .

SFX 1992 N 1
SFX 1992 0 xera .

SFX 1993 N 1
SFX 1993 0 xi .

SFX 1994 N 1
SFX 1994 0 xian .

SFX 1995 N 1
SFX 1995 0 xide .

SFX 1996 N 1
SFX 1996 0 ximative .

SFX 1997 N 1
SFX 1997 0 ximatively .

SFX 1998 N 1
SFX 1998 0 xlokk .

SFX 1999 N 1
SFX 1999 0 y .

SFX 2000 N 1
SFX 2000 0 yal .

SFX 2001 N 1
SFX 2001 0 yang .

SFX 2002 N 1
SFX 2002 0 yao .

SFX 2003 N 1
SFX 2003 0 ycle .

SFX 2004 N 1
SFX 2004 0 ycles .

SFX 2005 N 1
SFX 2005 0 ye .

SFX 2006 N 1
SFX 2006 0 year .

SFX 2007 N 1
SFX 2007 0 yes .

SFX 2008 N 1
SFX 2008 0 yk .

SFX 2009 N 1
SFX 2009 0 yl .

SFX 2010 N 1
SFX 2010 0 yletic .

SFX 2011 N 1
SFX 2011 0 yly .

SFX 2012 N 1
SFX 2012 0 yses .

SFX 2013 N 1
SFX 2013 0 ysin .

SFX 2014 N 1
SFX 2014 0 ysis .

SFX 2015 N 1
SFX 2015 0 ysk .

SFX 2016 N 1
SFX 2016 0 ytic .

SFX 2017 N 1
SFX 2017 0 yuan .

SFX 2018 N 1
SFX 2018 0 yx .

SFX 2019 N 1
SFX 2019 0 yxes .

SFX 2020 N 1
SFX 2020 0 z .

SFX 2021 N 1
SFX 2021 0 zang .

SFX 2022 N 1
SFX 2022 0 zation .

SFX 2023 N 1
SFX 2023 0 ze .

SFX 2024 N 1
SFX 2024 0 zed .

SFX 2025 N 1
SFX 2025 0 zes .

SFX 2026 N 1
SFX 2026 0 zesis .

SFX 2027 N 1
SFX 2027 0 zhno .

SFX 2028 N 1
SFX 2028 0 zhou .

SFX 2029 N 1
SFX 2029 0 zhu .

SFX 2030 N 1
SFX 2030 0 zi .

SFX 2031 N 1
SFX 2031 0 zine .

SFX 2032 N 1
SFX 2032 0 zing .

SFX 2033 N 1
SFX 2033 0 zoal .

SFX 2034 N 1
SFX 2034 0 zoological .

SFX 2035 N 1
SFX 2035 0 zoologies .

SFX 2036 N 1
SFX 2036 0 zoologist .

SFX 2037 N 1
SFX 2037 0 zoologists .

SFX 2038 N 1
SFX 2038 0 zoology .

SFX 2039 N 1
SFX 2039 0 ‐Jones .
