Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/en_Supplemental.dic
alcapton/1939
alkapton/1939
alleviator/1999
allosaur/1682,1941,1944
amphidiploid/1682,1999
aneuploid/848,1999
ankylosaur/1682,1941,1944
annunciator/1682,1999
apatosaur/1941,1944
armour/565,603,634,848,882,1682,1999
assimilator/1999
autoradiograph/819,848,1682,1999
Azua/1999
barosaur/1941
basilar/1999
bloodguilt/1682,1999
botulin/82,1682,1929,1930,1941,1944
brazil/1682,1979,1980
Canum/1955
caranda/1999
ceratosaur/1941
cero/1682,1941
coiffe/510,1682,1934,1940,1942,1944
cole/1682,1983,1984
confit/1937,1938
Connell/1999
continuo/1946,1947
corythosaur/1941
couldn't/1954
Cuy/1932
dacoit/848,1682,1999
dakoit/848,1682,1999
depreciator/1682,1999
djinn/806,1682,1999
dramaturg/557,819,821,848,1999
electromyograph/848,1682,1999
endomorph/819,848,1682,1999
eparch/808,848,1999
epical/2018,2019
genic/1925
guaiac/1682,1929,1930
hadn't/1954
herrerasaur/1941
heteroploid/1999
holonym/1999
homoeopath/1682,1999
hypernym/1682,1999
hyponym/848,1682,1999
ichthyosaur/1682,1941,1944
ilxx/1991
indument/1929
Ivano/1949,1960
jambeau/1991
jeweller/848,1682,1999
Juba/2009
justiciar/848,1682,1999
Kep/1926
Kishi/1964
Kota/1590,2008
lachrymator/1999
lacrimator/1682,1999
laisse/2020
lyssa/1958
Mazar/1932
megalosaur/1682,1941,1944
melilot/1682,1941
meronym/1999
metic/1682,1927,1928
mitre/510,1682,1983,1984
Moret/2020
mustn't/1954
myoglobin/1682,1939
naprapath/848,1999
orogen/819,1999
pachycephalosaur/1941
papilloma/1682,1958
parvo/1682,1958,1959
photolithograph/848,1682,1999
pilar/1999
pisanosaur/1941
pizzaz/2025
plesiosaur/1682,1941
Podolsk/1999
polyploid/1682,1999
psittacosaur/1941
pyrograph/603,819,1999
rondeau/1991
shittim/1682,1979,1980
shouldn't/1954
skiagraph/848,1682,1999
sonograph/848,1999
staurikosaur/1941
sternutator/848,1682,1999
struct/1682,1935
styracosaur/1941
subnet/1981,1982
superlunar/1999
suspensor/1682,1999
Tait/1931
Tanga/2000
thermograph/1682,1999
thermoregulator/1682,1999
they'd/1954
toponym/819,1682,1999
translunar/1999
troponym/1999
unsex/565,646,882,1999
validator/1682,1999
volar/848,1999
waggon/603,634,1682,1985
whitlow/1682,1983
who'd/1954
won't/1954
wouldn't/1954
you'd/1954
Zeta/2039
